Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2615YC (1) 91 lh/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. BOARD OF MEDICINE ââ STANDARDS OF PRACTICE FOR 1 PRESCRIBING CERTAIN PAIN MEDICATIONS. 2 1. The board of medicine shall amend the standards of 3 practice for appropriate pain management as established by rule 4 in 653 IAC 13.2, to specifically require all of the following: 5 a. That prior to issuing an initial prescription for a 6 controlled substance in schedule I or any opioid pain reliever 7 that is a prescription drug in a course of treatment for acute 8 or chronic pain, and prior to issuing a third prescription in 9 the same course of treatment, a physician shall discuss with 10 the patient, or the patientâs parent or guardian if the patient 11 has not reached majority as described in section 599.1, all of 12 the following: 13 (1) The risks of addiction and overdose associated with 14 opioid drugs and the dangers of taking opioid drugs with 15 alcohol, benzodiazepines, and other central nervous system 16 depressants. 17 (2) The reasons the prescription is necessary. 18 (3) Alternative treatments that may be available. 19 (4) The risks associated with the use of the drugs 20 being prescribed, specifically that opioids are highly 21 addictive, even when taken as prescribed, that there is a 22 risk of developing a physical or psychological dependence 23 on the prescription drug, and that taking more opioids than 24 prescribed, or mixing sedatives, benzodiazepines, or alcohol 25 with opioids, may result in fatal respiratory depression. 26 b. That the physician include a note in the patientâs 27 medical record, confirming that the physician has discussed 28 with the patient, or the patientâs parent or guardian, as 29 applicable, the information specified under subsection 1. 30 2. This section shall not apply to a prescription for a 31 patient who is at the stage in the progression of cancer or 32 other terminal illness when the goal of pain management is 33 comfort care including when the patient is receiving hospice 34 care from a licensed hospice or palliative care, or to any 35 -1- LSB 2615YC (1) 91 lh/ko 1/ 2 H.F. _____ medications prescribed for use in the treatment of substance 1 use disorder or opioid dependence. 2